North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 11. Wastewater Systems.
§ 130A-339.
Limitation on electrical service.

No person shall allow permanent electrical service to a residence, place of business or place of public assembly upon construction, location or relocation until the official electrical inspector with jurisdiction as provided in

G.S. 143-143.2

certifies to the electrical supplier that the required improvement permit authorization for wastewater system construction and an operation permit or authorization under G.S. 130A-337(c) or the letter of confirmation
authorizing wastewater system operation under G.S. 130A-336.1(m) has been obtained. Temporary electrical service necessary for constructing a residence, place of business or place of public assembly can be provided upon compliance
with

G.S. 130A-338

.

History.
1973, c. 452, s. 8; 1981, c. 949, s. 3; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1995, c. 285, s. 1; 2015-286, s. 4.14(e).

§ 130A-340.
Review procedures and appeals.

The Department, upon request by an applicant for an improvement permit, shall provide a technical review of any scientific data and system design submitted by the applicant. The data and system design shall be evaluated by professional peers of those
who prepared the data and system design. The results of the technical review shall be available prior to a decision by the local health department and shall not affect an applicant’s right to a contested hearing under Chapter 150B
of the General Statutes.

History.
1989, c. 764, s. 5.

§ 130A-341.
Consideration of a site with existing fill.

Upon application to the local health department, a site that has existing fill, including one on which fill material was placed prior to July 1, 1977, and that has sand or loamy sand for a depth of at least 36 inches below the existing ground surface,
shall be evaluated for an on-site wastewater system. The Commission shall adopt rules to implement this section.

History.
1989, c. 764, s. 8; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 944, s. 7.

§ 130A-342.
Residential wastewater treatment systems.

Individual residential wastewater treatment systems that are approved and listed in accordance with the standards adopted by the National Sanitation Foundation, Inc. for Class I residential wastewater treatment systems, as set out in Standard 40 of the
National Sanitation Foundation, Inc., (as approved 13 January 2001) as amended, shall be permitted under rules adopted by the Commission. The Commission may establish standards in addition to those set by the National Sanitation
Foundation, Inc.

A permitted system with a design flow of less than 1,500 gallons per day shall be operated by a person who is a Subsurface Water Pollution Control System Operator as certified by the Water Pollution Control System Operators Certification Commission and
authorized by the manufacturer of the individual residential wastewater treatment system. The Commission may, in addition to the requirement for a certified Subsurface Water Pollution Control System Operator, establish additional
standards for wastewater systems with a design flow of 1,500 gallons or greater per day.

Each county, in which one or more residential wastewater treatment systems permitted pursuant to this section are in use, shall document the performance of each system and report the results to the Department annually.

History.
1989, c. 727, s. 223(b); c. 764, s. 9; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, ss. 12, 37; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 944, s. 8; 1995, c. 285, s. 1; 1997-443, ss. 11A.84, 11A.119(a); 2001-505, s. 2.1; 2015-286, s. 4.14(j).

§ 130A-343.
Approval of on-site subsurface wastewater systems.

Definitions. — As used in this section:

“Accepted wastewater dispersal system” means any subsurface wastewater dispersal system, other than a conventional wastewater system, that: (i) has been previously approved as an Innovative wastewater dispersal system or is a wastewater dispersal system
specifically identified in a rule adopted by the Commission; (ii) has been in general use in this State as a wastewater dispersal system for more than five years; and (iii) has been approved by the Commission for general
use or use in one or more specific applications. An Accepted wastewater dispersal system may be approved for use in applications for which a conventional wastewater system is unsuitable. The Commission may impose design,
operation, maintenance, monitoring, and management requirements on the use of an Accepted wastewater dispersal system that it determines to be appropriate.

Recodified as subdivision (a)(7).

“Conventional wastewater system”, “conventional sewage system”, or “conventional septic tank system” means a subsurface wastewater system that consists of a traditional septic or settling tank and a gravity-fed subsurface dispersal field that uses washed
natural stone or gravel of approved size and grade and piping to distribute effluent to soil in one or more nitrification trenches and that does not include any other appurtenance.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-286, s. 4.15(a), effective October 22, 2015.

“Innovative wastewater system” means any wastewater system, other than a conventional wastewater system or a provisional wastewater system, or any technology, device, or component of a wastewater system that: (i) has been demonstrated to perform in a
manner equal or superior to a conventional wastewater system; (ii) is constructed of materials whose physical and chemical properties provide the strength, durability, and chemical resistance to allow the system to withstand
loads and conditions as required by rules adopted by the Commission; and (iii) has been approved by the Department for general use or for one or more specific applications. An innovative wastewater system may be approved
for use in applications for which a conventional wastewater system is unsuitable. The Department may impose any design, operation, maintenance, monitoring, and management requirements on the use of an innovative wastewater
system that it determines to be appropriate. A wastewater system approved by a nationally recognized certification body and in compliance with the ongoing verification program of such body may submit a sampling protocol
for innovative system approval that reduces the data sets required for such approval by fifty percent (50%). Such an application shall include all of the data associated with the nationally recognized certification body’s
verification of the system’s performance.

“Nationally recognized certification body” means a third-party certification body for wastewater systems or system components that is accredited by an entity widely recognized in the United States such as the American National Standards Institute, the
Standards Council of Canada, or the International Accreditation Service, Inc.

(6a)
“Prefabricated permeable block panel system” is a series of units for onsite wastewater dispersal manufactured of cementitious materials of coarse and fine lightweight expanded shale aggregate along with
Portland cement, connected together by plastic pipe. The unit shall be of rigid design, constructed and installed to withstand load requirements without collapse, compression, or deflection.

“Provisional wastewater system” means any wastewater system or any technology, device, or component of a wastewater system that, on the basis of (i) research acceptable to the Department or (ii) approval of the wastewater system by a nationally recognized
certification body for a period that exceeds one year for research, testing, or trial use under actual field conditions in this State pursuant to a protocol that has been approved by the Department.

Adoption of Rules Governing Approvals. — The Commission shall adopt rules for the approval and permitting of innovative, conventional, provisional, and accepted wastewater systems. The rules shall address the criteria to be considered prior to issuing
an approval for a system, requirements for preliminary design plans and specifications that must be submitted, methodology to be used, standards for monitoring and evaluating the system, research evaluation of the system, the plan
of work for monitoring system performance and maintenance, and any additional matters the Commission determines are necessary for verification of the performance of a wastewater system or system component.

Procedure for Modifications or Revocations. — The Department may modify, suspend, or revoke the approval of a wastewater system if the Department determines that the approval is based on false, incomplete, or misleading information or if the Department
finds that modification, suspension, or revocation is necessary to protect public health, safety, or welfare. The Department shall provide a listing of all approved innovative, provisional, and accepted wastewater systems to the
local health departments annually, and notify the local health departments within 30 days of any modification or revocation of an approval of a wastewater system or system component.

Evaluation Protocols. — The Department shall approve one or more nationally recognized protocols for the evaluation of wastewater systems. Any protocol approved by the Department shall specify a minimum number of sites that must be evaluated and the
duration of the evaluation period. At the request of a manufacturer of a wastewater system, the Department may approve an alternative protocol for use in the evaluation of the performance of the manufacturer’s wastewater system.
A protocol for the evaluation of a wastewater system approved by the Department pursuant to this section is a scientific standard within the meaning of G.S. 150B-2(8a)h.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-286, s. 4.15(a), effective October 22, 2015.

Provisional Systems. — A manufacturer of a wastewater system may apply to the Department to have the system provisionally approved for use in this State. Any wastewater system approved based on its approval by a nationally recognized certification body
must be designed and installed in a manner consistent with the system evaluated and approved by the nationally recognized certification body. The manufacturer shall submit a proposal for evaluation of the system to the Department.
The proposal shall contain procedures for obtaining specified information necessary to achieve innovative status upon completion of the provisional status. The proposal for evaluation shall include the design of the system, a description
of any laboratory or field research or testing that will be used to evaluate the system, a description of the research or testing protocol, and the credentials of the independent laboratory, consultant, or other entity that will
be conducting the research or testing on the system. The proposal may include an evaluation of research and testing conducted in other states to the extent that the research and testing involves soil types, climate, hydrology,
and other relevant conditions that are comparable to conditions in this State and if the research or testing was conducted pursuant to a protocol acceptable to the Department. The manufacturer shall enter into a contract for an
evaluation of the performance of the controlled demonstration wastewater system with an independent laboratory, consultant, or other entity that has expertise in the evaluation of wastewater systems and that is approved by the
Department. The manufacturer may install up to 200 provisional wastewater systems on sites that are suitable for a conventional wastewater system and that have a repair area of sufficient size to allow installation of a conventional
wastewater system, an approved innovative wastewater system, or an accepted wastewater system if the provisional wastewater system fails to perform properly. If the provisional wastewater system is intended for use on sites that
are not suitable for a conventional wastewater system, the Department may approve the installation of the provisional wastewater system if the Department determines that the manufacturer can provide an acceptable alternative method
for collection, treatment, and dispersal of the wastewater. The Department shall approve applications for provisional systems based on approval by a nationally recognized certification body within 90 days of receipt of a complete
application. A manufacturer that chooses to remove its product from the nationally recognized standard during the provisional approval may continue its application in this State pursuant to requirements and procedures established
by the Department.

Innovative Systems. — A manufacturer of a wastewater system for on-site subsurface use may apply for and be considered for innovative system status by the Department in one of the following ways:

If the wastewater system has been approved as a provisional wastewater system pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, the manufacturer may apply to have the system approved as an innovative wastewater system based on successful completion of the evaluation
protocols established pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.

If the wastewater system has not been evaluated or approved as a provisional wastewater system pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, the manufacturer may apply to the Department to have the system approved as an innovative wastewater system on the
basis of comparable research and testing conducted in other states. The manufacturer shall provide the Department with the data and findings of all evaluations of the performance of the system that have been conducted in
any state by or on behalf of the manufacturer. The manufacturer shall also provide the Department with a summary of the data and findings of all other evaluations of the performance of the system that are known to the manufacturer.

If the wastewater system has not been evaluated or approved as a provisional system pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, but has been evaluated under protocol established by a nationally recognized certification body for at least two consecutive
years, has been found to perform acceptably based on the criteria of the protocol, and is designed and will be installed in a manner consistent with the system evaluated and approved by the nationally recognized certification
body, the manufacturer may apply to have the system approved as an innovative wastewater system.Within 30 days of receipt of the initial application, the Department shall either (i) notify the manufacturer of any items
necessary to complete the application or (ii) notify the manufacturer that its application is complete. The Department shall publish a notice that the manufacturer has submitted an application under this subsection in the
North Carolina Register and may provide additional notice to the public via the Internet or by other means. The Department shall receive public comment on the application for at least 30 days after the date the notice is
published in the North Carolina Register. In making a determination under this subsection, the Department shall consider the data, findings, and recommendations submitted by the manufacturer and all public comment. The
Department may also consider any other information that the Department determines to be relevant. The Department shall determine: (i) whether the system performs in a manner equal or superior to a conventional wastewater
system, in terms of structural integrity, treatment, and hydraulic performance; (ii) whether the system is constructed of materials whose physical and chemical properties provide the strength, durability, and chemical resistance
to allow the system to withstand loads and conditions as required by rules adopted by the Commission; (iii) the circumstances in which use of the system is appropriate; and (iv) any conditions and limitations related to
the use of the system. The Department shall make the determinations required by this subsection and approve or deny the application within 90 days after the Department receives a complete application from a manufacturer.
If the Department fails to act on the application within 90 days of the notice of receipt of the complete application, the manufacturer may treat the application as denied and challenge the denial by filing a contested
case as provided in Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. If the Department approves an innovative wastewater system, the Department shall notify the manufacturer of the approval and specify the circumstances
in which use of the system is appropriate and any conditions and limitations related to the use of the system.

(g1)

Approval of Functionally Equivalent Trench Systems as Innovative Systems. —
A manufacturer of a wastewater trench system may petition the Commission to have the wastewater trench system approved as an innovative wastewater system as provided in this subsection.

(1)
The Commission shall approve a wastewater trench system as an innovative wastewater system if it finds that there is clear, convincing, and cogent evidence that the wastewater trench system is functionally
equivalent to a wastewater trench system that is approved as an accepted wastewater system. A wastewater trench system shall be considered functionally equivalent to an accepted wastewater trench system if the performance
characteristics of the wastewater trench system satisfy all of the following requirements:

The physical properties and chemical durability of the materials from which the wastewater trench system is constructed are equal to or superior to the physical properties and chemical durability of the materials from which the accepted wastewater trench
system is constructed.

The permeable sidewall area and bottom infiltrative area of the wastewater trench system are equal to or greater than the permeable sidewall area and bottom infiltrative area of the accepted wastewater trench system at a field-installed size.

The wastewater trench system utilizes a similar method and manner of function for the conveyance and application of effluent as the accepted wastewater trench system.

The structural integrity of the wastewater trench system is equal to or superior to the structural integrity of the accepted wastewater trench system.

The wastewater trench system shall provide a field installed system storage volume equal to or greater than the field installed system storage volume of the accepted wastewater trench system.

(2)
As part of its petition, the manufacturer shall provide to the Commission all of the following information:

Specifications of the wastewater trench system.

Data necessary to demonstrate that the wastewater trench system is functionally equivalent to a wastewater trench system that is approved as an accepted wastewater system.

A certified statement from an independent, third-party professional engineer or testing laboratory that, based on verified documentation, the wastewater trench system is functionally equivalent to an accepted wastewater system.

(3)
Approval of a wastewater trench system as an innovative wastewater system shall not be conditioned on the manufacturer of the wastewater trench system having operational systems installed
in the State.

The Commission shall authorize the use of a wastewater trench system as an innovative wastewater system in the same applications as the accepted wastewater trench system.

The Commission shall not include conditions and limitations in the approval of a wastewater trench system as an innovative wastewater system that are not included in the approval of the accepted wastewater trench system.

Accepted Wastewater Dispersal Systems. — A manufacturer of an Innovative wastewater dispersal system or other approved trench dispersal system specifically identified in a rule adopted by the Commission that has been in general use in this State for a
minimum of five years may petition the Commission to have the system designated as an Accepted wastewater system as provided in this subsection. The manufacturer shall provide the Commission with the data and findings of all prior
evaluations of the performance of the system in this State and other states referenced in the petition, including disclosure of any conditions found to result in unacceptable structural integrity, treatment, or hydraulic performance.
In addition, the manufacturer shall provide the Commission with information sufficient to enable the Commission to fully evaluate the performance of the system in this State for at least the five-year period immediately preceding
the petition. The Commission shall designate a wastewater dispersal system as an Accepted wastewater system only if it finds that there is clear, convincing, and cogent evidence based on actual field surveys and county activity
reports (i) to confirm the findings made by the Department at the time the Department approved the system as a wastewater dispersal system and (ii) that the system performs in a manner that is equal or superior to a conventional
or Accepted wastewater system under actual field conditions in this State. The Commission shall specify the circumstances in which use of the system is appropriate and any conditions and limitations related to the use of the system.

Nonproprietary Wastewater Systems. — The Department may initiate a review of a nonproprietary wastewater system and approve the system for use as a provisional wastewater system or an innovative wastewater system without having received an application
from a manufacturer. The Department may recommend that the Commission designate a nonproprietary wastewater system as an accepted wastewater system without having received a petition from a manufacturer.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-286, s. 4.15(a), effective October 22, 2015.

(j1)

Clarification With Respect to Certain Dispersal Media. —
In considering the application by a manufacturer of a wastewater system utilizing expanded polystyrene synthetic aggregate particles as a septic effluent dispersal medium for approval of the system under this section,
neither the Commission nor the Department may condition, delay, or deny the approval based on the particle or bulk density of the expanded polystyrene material. With respect to approvals already issued by the Department or
Commission that include conditions or requirements related to the particle or bulk density of expanded polystyrene material, the Commission or Department, as applicable, shall promptly reissue all such approvals with the conditions
and requirements relating to the density of expanded polystyrene material permanently deleted while leaving all other terms and conditions of the approval intact.

Fees. — The Department shall collect the following fees under this section:

Review of an alternative protocol

under subsection (d) of this section $1,000.00

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-286, s. 4.15(a), effective October 22, 2015.

Review of a provisional system $3,000.00

Review of an innovative system $3,000.00

Review of an accepted system $3,000.00

Review of a residential wastewater treatment

system pursuant to

G.S. 130A-342

$1,500.00

Review of a component or device required of a system $ 100.00

Modification to approved accepted, provisional, or

innovative system $1,000.00

On-Site Wastewater System Account. — The On-Site Wastewater System Account is established as a nonreverting account within the Department. Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be placed in the On-Site Wastewater System Account and shall be applied
only to the costs of implementing this section.

History.
1989, c. 764, s. 10; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 944, s. 9; 1995, c. 285, s. 1; 2001-505, s. 2.2; 2011-261, s. 1; 2014-120, s. 28(a); 2015-286, s. 4.15(a); 2018-114, s. 12; 2019-151, s. 13; 2021-117, s. 12.1.

Modification of Approved Wastewater Systems.

Session Laws 2014-120, s. 47(a)-(e), provides: “(a) The definitions set out in

G.S. 130A-343

shall apply to this section.

“(b) 15A NCAC 18A .1969(j) (Modification of Approved Systems). — Until the effective date of the revised permanent rule that the Commission is required to adopt pursuant to Section 47(d) of this act, the Commission and the Department shall implement 15A
NCAC 18A .1969(j) (Modification of Approved Systems) as provided in Section 47(c) of this act.

“(c) Implementation. — Notwithstanding 15A NCAC 18A .1969(j) (Modification of Approved Systems), the rule shall be implemented so as to not require a survey or audit of installed modified accepted systems in order to confirm the satisfactory performance
of such systems.

“(d) Additional Rule-Making Authority. — The Commission for Public Health shall adopt a rule to amend 15A NCAC 18A .1969(j) (Modification of Approved Systems) consistent with Section 47(c) of this act. Notwithstanding G.S. 150B-19(4), the rule adopted
by the Commission pursuant to this section shall be substantively identical to the provisions of Section 47(c) of this act. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are not subject to Part 3 of Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General
Statutes. Rules adopted pursuant to this section shall become effective as provided in G.S. 150B-21.3(b1) as though 10 or more written objections had been received as provided by G.S. 150B-21.3(b2).

“(e) Sunset. — Section 47(c) of this act expires on the date that the rule adopted pursuant to Section 47(d) of this act becomes effective.”

Establish Standards and Pilot Program for Highly Treated Wastewater.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 8.26(a)-(g) provides: “(a) The following definitions apply in this section:

“(1) Highly treated wastewater. – Effluent discharged from a wastewater system that is designed and operated to meet the following standards:

“a. With respect to the carbonaceous biological oxygen demand (CBOD5), 10mg/L.

“b. With respect to NH3, 10mg/L.

“c. With respect to total nitrogen, 10mg/L, or a minimum of sixty percent (60%) reduction from the influent total Kjeldahl nitrogen.

“d. With respect to total phosphorus, 5mg/L, unless discharged into nutrient sensitive waters.

“e. With respect to fecal coliforms, 10 colonies/100mL.

“f. Capture and removal of residual sludge and biogases.

“g. With respect to total suspended solids, less than or equal to 10mg/L.

“(2) Wastewater system. – Defined in

G.S. 130A-334

.

“(b) Funds allocated from the State Fiscal Recovery Fund to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina for the Innovative Highly Treated Wastewater Pilot Program (Program) shall be provided to the North Carolina Policy Collaboratory at
the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill (Collaboratory) to establish the Program as described in this subsection. The Collaboratory may use up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) of the funds allocated by this subsection for
research and administrative costs related to the Program, of which up to two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) may be used to reimburse the Department of Environmental Quality for its administrative costs. Project funding from the
funds allocated by this section is limited to the lesser of forty percent (40%) of the total project cost or four million dollars ($4,000,000). In implementing the Program, the Collaboratory shall do the following:

“(1) Review and evaluate wastewater systems producing highly treated wastewater, either as a single unit or as a combination of treatment devices for suitability as a wastewater treatment option for local governments, sanitary districts, or public authorities
considered distressed, as defined by

G.S. 159G-20

, that (i) have no more than 10,000 customers or (ii) include residential or commercial developments or subdivisions that are unable to be served by existing wastewater systems.

“(2) Identify no less than five local governments, sanitary districts, or public authorities meeting the criteria set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection as participants in the Program.

“(3) Work with Program participants to submit permit applications to the Department of Environmental Quality and, upon permit approval, to construct the wastewater systems.

“(4) Conduct research and monitoring to quantify the efficacy of the wastewater systems funded and built as part of the Program. The Collaboratory shall share results of this research with Program participants and the Department.

“(c) The Department of Environmental Quality shall do the following with respect to entities receiving wastewater systems producing highly treated wastewater under subsection (b) of this section to the extent not inconsistent with its National Pollutant
Discharge Elimination System permitting authority delegated from the United States Environmental Protection Agency:

“(1) Review and qualify wastewater systems producing highly treated wastewater, either as a single unit or as a combination of treatment devices. The Department shall require the manufacturer of the wastewater system within five days of the qualification
under this subdivision to file with the Department a performance bond or other surety with a minimum term of five years to be executed in favor of the permittee in the amount sufficient to cover system replacement. Operation, maintenance,
abuse, or change in hydraulic flows or wastewater characteristics shall not be attached to the performance bond or surety.

“(2) Work with the entities identified under subsection (b) of this section to permit the wastewater systems meeting the standards for highly treated wastewater set forth in subsection (a) of this section. The system must be consistent with the action
plan developed by the entities as set forth in G.S. 159G-45(b)(3).

“(d) No later than December 1, 2024, the Collaboratory, with the assistance of the Department of Environmental Quality, shall provide a report to the Environmental Management Commission and the Environmental Review Commission evaluating the systems permitted
under the pilot program established in this section. The report shall assess the effectiveness of these systems compared to the systems previously operated by the local government, sanitary district, or public authority, along with
suggestions for further legislation and rulemaking necessary to support the adoption of highly treated wastewater systems.

“(e) The Commission for Public Health shall adopt temporary and permanent rules to provide for approval of treatment system applications for use in the State and create benefits for systems producing higher wastewater treatment levels that are proportional
and graduated. These rules shall include, at a minimum, the following:

“(1) Subject to the requirements of subdivision (4) of this subsection, applications for provisional wastewater systems, as defined in G.S. 130A-343(a)(7), from manufacturers of wastewater systems with certification and listing for one or more years from
a nationally recognized certification body, as defined in G.S. 130A-343(a)(6), shall be approved within 45 days of receipt of a complete application. The proposed wastewater system listed in the application shall be identical in design
and features to the wastewater system certified and listed by the nationally recognized certification body.

“(2) Subject to the requirements of subdivision (4) of this subsection, applications for proposed wastewater systems without certification and listing from a nationally recognized certification body, as defined in G.S. 130A-343(a)(6), shall be approved
as provisional and shall allow the issuance of a maximum of 200 improvement permits and authorizations for wastewater system construction.

“(3) Subject to the requirements of subdivision (4) of this subsection, applications for innovative status of a wastewater system shall be approved (i) after two years of certification and listing by a nationally recognized certification body and one
year of field data in this State or other states or countries approved by DHHS or (ii) if not listed by a nationally recognized body, after completion of provisional status requirements in accordance with G.S. 130A-343(f). For systems
receiving innovative status as a result of receiving national certification, those systems shall be identical to the system certified and listed by the nationally recognized certification body and identical to the systems installed
in this State and approved by DHHS or other states or countries.

“(4) Applications for wastewater systems and dispersal products received after the effective date of this subsection shall demonstrate structural integrity, including subjecting the trench system to axle load of 16,000 pounds when covered with 12 inches
of compacted soil and 4,000 pounds when covered with 6 inches of compacted soil without breakage, collapse, fracture, or compression that prevents the downline distribution of wastewater. Wastewater treatment devices with identifying
surface or above grade access for operation and maintenance shall be excluded from load testing when installed and backfilled in accordance with the rules or the product approval.

“(5) Wastewater systems found by DHHS to meet standards for reclaimed water based on (i) field demonstrations over a two-year period in this State or other states approved by DHHS that the system meets reclaimed water standards or (ii) certification and
listing by a nationally recognized body, such as the National Sanitation Foundation Standard 350, shall be approved for designs that eliminate repair area rules in Type I soils. Elimination of repair areas shall be considered for domestic
strength wastewater only. Systems permitted without repair area under this subsection shall be classified by DHHS as a Type VI(b) system under DHHS rules and shall be inspected no less than 12 times per year.

“(6) Vertical and horizontal restrictions to property lines and limiting conditions for systems approved under this subsection shall be reduced proportionally to the graduated increases in wastewater quality.

“(f) The Commission for Public Health and the Department of Health and Human Services shall report quarterly on their implementation of subsection (d) of this section beginning no later than May 1, 2022, and shall continue quarterly reporting until rulemaking
activities required by this section have been completed.

“(g) This section is effective when it becomes law. Funds allocated by this section that are not spent or encumbered by June 30, 2024, shall revert to the Wastewater Reserve to be used for any of the purposes authorized in

G.S. 159G-32(b)

.”

§ 130A-343.1.
Transfer of ownership of provisionally approved septic tanks and innovative septic tank systems to joint agency in certain counties; inspection fees in those counties.

As used in this section, “provisionally approved septic tank or innovative septic tank system” means a septic tank system located in soil that is classified as provisionally suitable or an innovative septic tank system, as those terms are used in Subchapter
18A of Chapter 18 of Title 15A of the North Carolina Administrative Code,

G.S. 130A-343

, and any applicable local rules or ordinances.

As used in this subsection, “unit of local government” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 160A-460

. One or more units of local government located in the Counties of Camden, Chowan, Currituck, Gates, Hertford, Pasquotank, Perquimans, Tyrrell, and Washington may establish a joint agency for the purpose of owning
and operating a provisionally approved septic tank or innovative septic tank system as provided in Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes. Bertie County may join any joint agency established under this subsection. The
owner of any provisionally approved septic tank or innovative septic tank system may, upon acceptance by a joint agency established under this subsection, transfer ownership of any real or personal property or interest therein
that is a part of or used in connection with the provisionally approved septic tank or innovative septic tank system to the joint agency. Notwithstanding

G.S. 160A-462(a)

, a joint agency created pursuant to this subsection may hold real property necessary to the undertaking. Any county named in this subsection may accept real or personal property described in this subsection from
the owner of the property for transfer to a joint agency established as provided in this subsection.

The Counties of Bertie, Camden, Chowan, Currituck, Gates, Hertford, Pasquotank, Perquimans, Tyrrell, and Washington may adopt an ordinance providing that any fee for the inspection, maintenance, and repair of a provisionally approved septic tank or other
innovative septic tank system may be billed as property taxes, may be payable in the same manner as property taxes, and in the case of nonpayment, may be collected in any manner by which property taxes can be collected. If the
ordinance states that delinquent fees can be collected in the same manner as delinquent real property taxes, the delinquent fees are a lien on the real property described on the bill that includes the fee.

History.
1999-288, ss. 1-3; 2001-78, ss. 1-3.

§ 130A-344.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 285, s. 2.

§ 130A-345.
Disposal of liquid condensate from residential heating and cooling systems.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every public or community wastewater system, as defined in G.S. 130A-334(8), shall provide for the collection of liquid condensate from residential heating and cooling systems by the public or community wastewater
system.

History.
2015-207, s. 6.